Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 32. The Kentucky Business Investment Program
154.32-050.
Enhanced incentive counties — Annual identification and certification or decertification — Criteria — Multicounty industrial park projects.

The authority shall identify and certify or decertify enhanced incentive counties on an annual basis as provided in this section.

Each fiscal year, the authority shall:

Obtain from the Department of Workforce Investment in the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, the final unemployment figures for the prior calendar year for each county and for the Commonwealth as a whole;

Identify those counties which have had:

A countywide unemployment rate that exceeds the statewide unemployment rate in the most recent five (5) consecutive calendar years; or

An average countywide rate of unemployment exceeding the statewide unemployment rate by two hundred percent (200%) in the most recent calendar year; and

Certify the counties identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection as enhanced incentive counties.

A county not certified under subsection (2) of this section may also be certified by the authority as an enhanced incentive county if the authority determines the county is one (1) of the sixty (60) most distressed counties in the Commonwealth based on the following criteria with equal weight given to each criterion:

The average countywide rate of unemployment in the most recent three (3) consecutive calendar years, using the information obtained under subsection (2)(a) of this section;

The percentage of adults twenty-five (25) years of age and older who have attained at least a high school education or equivalent, on the basis of the most recent data available from the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census; and

The quality of the roads in the county. Quality of roads shall be determined by the access within a county to roads, ranked in descending order from best quality to worst quality, as certified to the authority by the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet as follows:

Two (2) or more interstate highways;

One (1) interstate highway;

A state four (4) lane parkway;

A four (4) lane principal arterial access to an interstate highway;

A state two (2) lane parkway; and

None of the preceding road types.

If the authority determines that an enhanced incentive county no longer meets the criteria to be certified as an enhanced incentive county under this section, the authority shall decertify that county.
(4) (a)

If the authority determines that an enhanced incentive county no longer meets the criteria to be certified as an enhanced incentive county under this section, the authority shall decertify that county.

Any economic development project located in an enhanced incentive county that was decertified by the authority after May 1, 2009, shall have until July 1 of the third year following the fiscal year in which the county was decertified to obtain final approval from the authority.

As used in this subsection, “industrial park” means a regional industrial park as defined in KRS 42.4588, or an industrial park created pursuant to an interlocal agreement in which revenues are shared as provided in KRS 65.210 to 65.300.
(5) (a)

As used in this subsection, “industrial park” means a regional industrial park as defined in KRS 42.4588, or an industrial park created pursuant to an interlocal agreement in which revenues are shared as provided in KRS 65.210 to 65.300.

An economic development project undertaken in an industrial park that is located in two (2) or more counties, one (1) of which is an enhanced incentive county, may be approved for the enhanced incentive county incentives set forth in this subchapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 13, effective June 26, 2009; 2019 ch. 146, § 25, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 98, § 15, effective July 15, 2020.

154.32-060.
Rehabilitation, replacement, or expansion of existing facilities — Criteria for approval as economic development project.

The authority shall not approve an economic development project that otherwise meets the requirements of this subchapter if the economic development project will result in the replacement of facilities existing in the state, except as provided in this section.

The authority may approve an economic development project that:

Rehabilitates an existing facility used for activities of an eligible company, if:

The facility has not been in operation for a period of ninety (90) or more consecutive days; or

The current occupant of the facility has advertised a notice of closure; and
2. a.

The current occupant of the facility has advertised a notice of closure; and

The eligible company proposing the economic development project is not an affiliate of the current occupant of the facility; or

The facility is sold or transferred pursuant to a foreclosure ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or an order of a bankruptcy court of competent jurisdiction; and
3. a.

The facility is sold or transferred pursuant to a foreclosure ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or an order of a bankruptcy court of competent jurisdiction; and

The title to the facility prior to the sale is not vested in the eligible company or an affiliate of the eligible company; or

The existing facility is rehabilitated to enable a business to produce vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment necessary to produce personal protective equipment;

Replaces an existing facility of an eligible company if:

Title to the facility:
1. a.

Title to the facility:

Is held by exercise of the power of eminent domain; or

May be taken pursuant to a nonappealable judgment granting authority to exercise the power of eminent domain; and

Normal operations at the facility cannot be resumed within twelve (12) months; or

The facility has been damaged or destroyed by fire or other casualty to the extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility within twelve (12) months; or

The existing facility is replaced to enable a business to produce vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment necessary to produce personal protective equipment; or

Replaces an existing facility located in the same county if the existing facility cannot be expanded due to the unavailability of real estate at or adjacent to the facility to be replaced. Any economic development project satisfying the requirements of this paragraph shall be eligible for incentives under this subchapter only to the extent of the expansion. No incentives shall be available for the equivalent of the facility to be replaced or rehabilitated.

The authority shall not approve an economic development project under this section which results in a lease abandonment or lease termination by the approved company without the consent of the lessor.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 14, effective June 26, 2009; 2021 ch. 185, § 121, effective June 29, 2021.

154.32-070.
Nonrefundable tax credit for economic development project by approved company.

For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2009, an approved company may be eligible for a credit of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Kentucky income tax imposed under KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401, that would otherwise be owed by the approved company to the Commonwealth for the approved company’s taxable year, on the income, Kentucky gross profits, or Kentucky gross receipts of the approved company generated by or arising from the economic development project.

The credit allowed the approved company shall be applied against both the income tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040, and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401, with credit ordering as provided in KRS 141.0205, for the taxable year for which the tax return of the approved company is filed, subject to the annual maximum set forth in the tax incentive agreement. Any credit not used in the year in which it was first available may be carried forward to subsequent years, provided that no credit may be carried forward beyond the term of the tax incentive agreement.

The approved company shall not be required to pay estimated tax payments under KRS 141.044 on the Kentucky taxable income, Kentucky gross receipts, or Kentucky gross profits generated by or arising from the eligible project.

The credit provided by this section shall be determined as provided in KRS 141.415.

The amount of incentives allowed in any year shall not exceed the lesser of the tax liability of the approved company related to the economic development project for that year or the annual maximum approved costs set forth in the tax incentive agreement. The incentives shall be allowed for each fiscal year of the approved company during the term of the tax incentive agreement for which a tax return is filed by the approved company.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 16, effective June 26, 2009; 2019 ch. 151, § 71, effective June 27, 2019.

154.32-080.
Advance disbursement of portion of incentives — Eligibility — Computation of maximum amount — Loan agreement — Repayment. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 17, effective June 26, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 172, § 9, effective March 26, 2019.

154.32-090.
Wage assessments against employees — Calculation of amount based on participation of local jurisdiction — Credit against individual income tax for employees — Assessment to cease at expiration of tax incentive agreement.

An approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of an approved company may impose wage assessments against employees as provided in this section if a wage assessment is included in the incentives awarded to the approved company in the tax incentive agreement. The level of wage assessment shall be negotiated as part of the tax incentive agreement.

If an economic development project is located in an enhanced incentive county, the approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of the approved company may require that each employee subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.020, whose job is determined by the authority to be created as a result of the economic development project, as a condition of employment, agree to an assessment of up to five percent (5%) of taxable wages.

If the economic development project is not located in an enhanced incentive county, and is located in a local jurisdiction where:
(3) (a)

If the economic development project is not located in an enhanced incentive county, and is located in a local jurisdiction where:

No local occupational license fee is imposed; or

A local occupational license fee greater than or equal to one percent (1%) is imposed; and
2. a.

A local occupational license fee greater than or equal to one percent (1%) is imposed; and

The local jurisdiction agrees to forgo one percent (1%) via credits against the local occupational license fee for the affected employees; then

An approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of an approved company may require that each employee subject to tax imposed by KRS 141.020, whose job is determined by the authority to be created as a result of the economic development project, as a condition of employment, agree to pay an assessment of up to four percent (4%) of taxable wages.

If:
(4) (a)

If:

The economic development project is not located in an enhanced incentive county, and is located in a jurisdiction where the local occupational license fee is less than one percent (1%); and

The local jurisdiction agrees to forgo the total amount of the local occupational license fee; then

An approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of an approved company may require that each employee subject to tax imposed by KRS 141.020, whose job is determined by the authority to be created as a result of the economic development project, as a condition of employment, agree to pay an assessment of up to three percent (3%) of taxable wages, plus a percentage equal to the amount of the local occupational license fee the local jurisdiction agrees to forgo.

If:
(5) (a)

If:

The project is not located in an enhanced incentive county and is located in a county where the jurisdiction imposes a local occupational license fee of less than one percent (1%); and

The local jurisdiction agrees to forgo only a portion of the total amount of the local occupational license fee; then

An approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of an approved company may require that each employee subject to tax imposed by KRS 141.020, whose job is determined by the authority to be created as a result of the economic development project, as a condition of employment, agree to pay an assessment to be determined as follows:

Divide the local occupational license fee that the local jurisdiction has agreed to forgo by the total local occupational license fee imposed;

Multiply the result determined under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph by three percent (3%); and

Add the result from subparagraph 2. of this paragraph to the local occupational license fee that the local jurisdiction has agreed to forgo.

If:
(6) (a)

If:

The project is not located in an enhanced incentive county, and is located in a county where the jurisdiction imposes a local occupational license fee equal to or greater than one percent (1%); and

The local jurisdiction agrees to forgo the local occupational license fee in an amount of less than one percent (1%); then

An approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of an approved company may require that each employee subject to tax imposed by KRS 141.020, whose job is determined by the authority to be created as a result of the economic development project, as a condition of employment, agree to pay an assessment to be determined as follows:

Divide the local occupational license fee that the local jurisdiction has agreed to forgo by one percent (1%);

Multiply the result determined under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph by three percent (3%); and

Add the result from subparagraph 2. of this paragraph to the local occupational license fee that the local jurisdiction has agreed to forgo.

If the project is not located in an enhanced incentive county, and:

Is located in a local jurisdiction that does not impose a local occupational license fee, the local jurisdiction shall be required to provide some alternative inducement satisfactory to the authority at the local level in order for a preliminarily approved company to receive final approval. However, the authority may waive this requirement if there are reasonable circumstances that prevent the local jurisdiction from providing a reasonable inducement; or

Is located in a local jurisdiction that does impose a local occupational license fee, the jurisdiction may request that the authority waive the local occupational license fee requirements established by subsection (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section if the local jurisdiction offers alternative inducements of similar value satisfactory to the authority. The authority shall review all requests for a waiver, and may waive the local occupational license fee requirements and instead require the local jurisdiction to provide alternative inducements of similar value if the authority determines that the circumstances warrant an alternative contribution by the local jurisdiction.

Each employee paying the assessment shall simultaneously be entitled to a credit against the Kentucky individual income tax required to be withheld under KRS 141.310 equal to the state portion of the assessment and shall be entitled to a credit against the local occupational license tax equal to the local portion of the assessment.

If more than one (1) local jurisdiction imposes an occupational license fee, the local jurisdiction portion of the assessment shall be prorated proportionately among the taxes imposed by the local jurisdictions unless one (1) local jurisdiction agrees to forgo the receipt of these taxes in an amount equal to the local jurisdiction portion of the wage assessment, in which case no proration shall be made.

If a full-time employee subject to state tax imposed by KRS 141.020 is already employed by the approved company at a site other than the site of the economic development project, that full-time employee’s job shall be deemed to have been created when the full-time employee is transferred to the site of the economic development project if the full-time employee’s existing job is filled with a new full-time employee.

If an approved company elects to impose the assessment as a condition of employment, it shall be authorized to deduct the assessment from each payment of wages to the employee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, if an approved company elects not to deduct the assessment from each payment of wages to the employee, but rather requests a reimbursement of state tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or local occupational tax in the aggregate after they have been paid to the state or local jurisdiction, no interest shall be paid by the state or by the local jurisdiction on that reimbursement.

No credit, or portion thereof, shall be allowed against any occupational license fee imposed by or dedicated solely to the board of education in a local jurisdiction.

An approved company imposing an assessment shall make its payroll, books, and records available to the authority or the department upon request, and shall file with the authority or department documentation pertaining to the assessment as the authority or department may require.

Any assessment of the wages of employees of an approved company in connection with their employment at an economic development project shall permanently cease at the expiration of the tax incentive agreement.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 18, effective June 26, 2009; 2012, ch. 43, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 172, § 5, effective March 26, 2019.

154.32-100.
Annual report on aggregate tax credits and assessments — Certification that approved company has received total incentives available.

By October 1 of each year, the department shall certify to the authority, in the form of an annual report, aggregate tax credits claimed on tax returns filed during the fiscal year ending June 30 of that year and aggregate assessments taken during the prior calendar year by approved companies with respect to their economic development projects under this subchapter, and shall certify to the authority, within ninety (90) days from the date an approved company has filed its state income tax return, when an approved company has taken tax credits or assessments equal to the total incentives available to the approved company.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 15, effective June 26, 2009.